Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.80.010

Rule-making authority.

Each political party organization may adopt rules governing its own organization and the nonstatutory functions of that organization.

[ 2005 c 2 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004); 2003 c 111 s 2001; 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 16; 1965 c 9 s 29.42.010. Prior: 1961 c 130 s 2; prior: 1943 c 178 s 1, part; 1939 c 48 s 1, part; 1927 c 200 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 158 s 1, part; 1909 c 82 s 6, part; 1907 c 209 s 22, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5198, part. Formerly RCW 29.42.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 29A.80.010 was amended by 2005 c 2 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 872) without cognizance of its repeal by 2004 c 271 s 193. For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025.

Short title—Intent—Contingent effective date—2005 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 872): See notes following RCW 29A.52.112.

PDFRCW 29A.80.010

Authority—Generally.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2001; 1977 ex.s. c 329 s 16; 1965 c 9 s 29.42.010. Prior: 1961 c 130 s 2; prior: 1943 c 178 s 1, part; 1939 c 48 s 1, part; 1927 c 200 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 158 s 1, part; 1909 c 82 s 6, part; 1907 c 209 s 22, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5198, part. Formerly RCW 29.42.010.]
Repealed by 2004 c 271 s 193.

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 29A.80.010 was amended by 2005 c 2 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 872) without cognizance of its repeal by 2004 c 271 s 193. For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025.